Arkansas, session 2025, HB1995.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY.
(a) Effective January 1, 2027, the offices of sheriff and tax
collector in Perry County, Arkansas, shall be separate offices.
(b) At the 2026 general election, the electors of Perry County shall
elect both a sheriff and a tax collector, and each officer so elected shall
take office on January 1, 2027.
(c) The sheriff and the tax collector in Perry County shall each give
bond for the faithful performance of their respective duties as provided by
law.
(d) The sheriff and the tax collector of Perry County shall each
receive compensation that shall be determined by the Perry County Quorum
Court within the minimum and maximum compensation range prescribed by the
General Assembly and shall hire deputies and have other allowances as
prescribed by the Perry County Quorum Court.




*SSS325*
04/07/2025 8:01:57 AM SSS325